North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-10.5 Midwestern Regional Higher Education Compact

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 6, effective July 1, 2019.

15-10.5-01.
Midwestern regional higher education compact.

The midwestern regional higher education compact is adopted as follows:

ARTICLE I - PURPOSE

The purpose of the midwestern higher education compact is to provide greater higher education opportunities and services in the midwestern region, with the aim of furthering regional access to, research in, and choice of higher education for the citizens residing in the states that are parties to this compact.

ARTICLE II - THE COMMISSION

The compacting states create the midwestern higher education commission, hereinafter called the commission. The commission is a body corporate of each compacting state. The commission has all the responsibilities, powers, and duties set forth in this chapter, including the power to sue and be sued, and any additional powers conferred upon it by subsequent action of the respective legislative assemblies of the compacting states in accordance with the terms of this compact.

The commission consists of the following five resident members from each state: the governor or the governor’s designee who serves during the tenure of office of the governor; two legislators, one from each house, except for Nebraska, which may appoint two legislators from its legislative assembly, who serve two-year terms and are appointed by the appropriate appointing authority in each house of the legislative assembly; and two other at large members, at least one of whom is to be selected from the field of higher education. The at large members are to be appointed as provided by the laws of the appointing state. One of the two at large members initially appointed in each state serves a two-year term. The other, and any regularly appointed successor to either at large member, serves a four-year term. All vacancies are to be filled in accordance with the laws of the appointing states. Any commissioner appointed to fill a vacancy serves until the end of the incomplete term.

The commission shall select annually, from among its members, a chairman, a vice chairman, and a treasurer.

The commission shall appoint an executive director who serves at its pleasure and who is secretary to the commission. The treasurer, the executive director, and other personnel as the commission determines must be bonded in the amounts required by the commission.

The commission shall meet at least once each calendar year. The chairman may call additional meetings and upon the request of a majority of the commission members of three or more compacting states, shall call additional meetings. The commission shall give public notice of all meetings. All meetings must be open to the public.

Each compacting state represented at any meeting of the commission is entitled to one vote. A majority of the compacting states constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless a larger quorum is required by the bylaws of the commission.

The commission may enter agreements with any other interstate education organization or agency, with institutions of higher education located in nonmember states, and with any of the various states to provide adequate programs and services in higher education for the citizens of the respective compacting states. After negotiations with interested institutions and interstate organizations or agencies, the commission shall determine the cost of providing the programs and services in higher education for use in these agreements.

The commission may establish and maintain offices in one or more of the compacting states.

The commission may establish committees and hire staff as necessary to carry out its functions.

The commission may provide for actual and necessary expenses for the attendance of its members at official meetings of the commission or of its designated committees.

ARTICLE III - POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION

1.

The commission shall adopt bylaws governing its management and operations.

2.

Notwithstanding the laws of any compacting state, the commission shall provide for the personnel policies and programs of the compact in its bylaws.

3.

The commission shall submit a budget to the governor and legislative assembly of each compacting state at the time and for the period required by each state. The budget must contain recommendations regarding the amount to be appropriated by each compacting state.

4.

The commission shall report annually to the legislative assemblies and governors of the compacting states, to the midwestern governors’ conference, and to the midwestern legislative conference of the council of state governments regarding the activities of the commission during the preceding year. The reports must include any recommendations that have been adopted by the commission.

5.

The commission may borrow, accept, or contract for the services of personnel from any state or from the United States, or from any subdivision or agency thereof, from any interstate agency, or from any person.

6.

The commission may accept for any of its purposes and functions under the compact donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state or the United States or from any subdivision or agency thereof, from an interstate agency, or from any person, and may receive, use, and dispose of the same.

ARTICLE IV - ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION

1.

The commission shall collect data on the long-range effects of the compact on higher education. By the end of the fourth year from the effective date of the compact and every two years thereafter, the commission shall review its accomplishments and make recommendations to the governors and legislative assemblies of the compacting states regarding continuance of the compact.

2.

The commission shall study higher education issues that are of particular concern to the midwestern region. The commission also shall study the need for higher education programs and services in the compacting states and the resources for meeting those needs. The commission shall prepare reports, on its research, for presentation to the governors and legislative assemblies of the compacting states, as well as to other interested parties. In conducting the studies, the commission may confer with any national or regional planning body. The commission may draft and recommend to the governors and legislative assemblies of the various compacting states suggested legislation addressing issues in higher education.

3.

The commission shall study the need for the provision of adequate programs and services in higher education, such as undergraduate, graduate, or professional student exchanges in the region. If a need for exchange in a field is apparent, the commission may enter agreements with any institution of higher education and with any compacting state to provide programs and services in higher education for the citizens of the respective compacting states. After negotiating with interested institutions and the compacting states, the commission shall determine the cost of providing the programs and services in higher education for use in its agreements. The contracting states shall contribute funds not otherwise provided, as determined by the commission, to carry out the agreements. The commission may also serve as the administrative and fiscal agent in carrying out agreements for higher education programs and services.

4.

The commission shall serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding higher education activities among institutions and agencies.

5.

The commission may provide services and research in any other area of regional concern.

ARTICLE V - FINANCE

1.

The compacting states will appropriate the amount necessary to finance the general operations of the commission, not otherwise provided for, when authorized by their respective legislative assemblies. The amount must be apportioned equally among the compacting states.

2.

The commission may not incur any obligations prior to the passage of appropriations adequate to meet the same; nor may the commission pledge the credit of any of the compacting states, except by and with the authority of the compacting state.

3.

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of its receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission are subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements handled by the commission must be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit must be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission.

4.

The accounts of the commission must be open at any reasonable time for inspection by duly authorized representatives of the compacting states and by persons authorized by the commission.

ARTICLE VI - ELIGIBLE PARTIES AND ENTRY INTO FORCE

1.

The states of Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Kansas, Michigan, Minnesota, Missouri, Nebraska, North Dakota, Ohio, South Dakota, and Wisconsin are eligible to become parties to this compact. Additional states may be eligible if approved by a majority of the compacting states.

2.

This compact becomes effective, as to any eligible party state, when its legislative assembly enacts the compact into law.

3.

An amendment to the compact becomes effective upon its enactment by the legislative assemblies of all compacting states.

ARTICLE VII - WITHDRAWAL, DEFAULT, AND TERMINATION

1.

A compacting state may withdraw from the compact by enacting a statute repealing the compact, but the withdrawal may not become effective until two years after the enactment of such statute. A withdrawing state is liable for any obligation that it incurred on account of its party status, up to the effective date of withdrawal, except that if the withdrawing state has specifically undertaken or committed itself to any performance of an obligation extending beyond the effective date of withdrawal, it remains liable to the extent of the obligation.

2.

If a compacting state at any time defaults in the performance of its obligations, assumed or imposed, in accordance with this compact, all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact or by agreements made under the compact are suspended from the effective date of the default, as fixed by the commission. The commission shall stipulate the conditions and maximum time for compliance under which the defaulting state may resume its regular status. Unless the default is remedied under the stipulations and within the time period set by the commission, the compact may be terminated with respect to the defaulting state by affirmative vote of a majority of the other member states. A defaulting state may be reinstated by performing all acts and obligations required by the commission.

ARTICLE VIII - SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

The provisions of this compact are severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any compacting state or of the United States or its applicability to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the compact and its applicability to any person or circumstance may not be affected. If the compact is found to be contrary to the constitution of any compacting state, the compact remains in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters. The provisions of the compact must be liberally construed to effectuate the purpose of the compact.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 6, effective July 1, 2019.

15-10.5-02.
Midwestern higher education commission - Terms - Vacancies.

The members of the midwestern higher education commission representing this state are:

The governor or the governor’s designee.

One member of the senate and one member of the house of representatives, appointed by the chairman of the legislative management.

Two at-large members, one of whom must be knowledgeable about the field of higher education, appointed by the governor.

The term of each legislative appointee is two years. One initial at-large member must be appointed for a term of two years and the other for a term of four years. Thereafter, the term of each at-large member is four years.

If a member vacates the position to which the member was appointed, the position must be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as that position was filled initially.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 6, effective July 1, 2019.